src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON BERRAHATTJA !!= @CODE@ Plural stems. Like IEDNITJA, these do not have corresponding singular stems. Most stems here have the same form as the pl nom form of diminutive derivations, but (while it may have originated as a diminuitive derivation) it is not the same derivation (today) and it does not have a singular form.
!                        +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>              R                    ;
                         +N+Cmp/PlGen:a%>Q1j          R                    ;
                            +N+Pl+Nom:a%>Q1           K                    ;
                            +N+Pl+Gen:a%>Q1j          K                    ;
                            +N+Pl+Acc:a%>Q1jt         K                    ;
                            +N+Pl+Ill:a%>Q1jda        K                    ;
                            +N+Pl+Ine:a%>Q1jn         K                    ;
                            +N+Pl+Ela:a%>Q1js         K                    ;
                            +N+Pl+Com:a%>Q1j          K                    ;
                            +N+Pl+Nom:a%>Q1           PxNomPlV             ; !Possessive suffixes
                            +N+Pl+Gen:a%>Q1j%>        PxC                  ; !
                            +N+Pl+Acc:a%>Q1jd%>       PxC                  ; !
                            +N+Pl+Ill:a%>Q1jdis%>     PxCs                 ; !
                            +N+Pl+Ine:a%>Q1jn%>       PxC                  ; !
                            +N+Pl+Ela:a%>Q1jst%>      PxC                  ; !
                            +N+Pl+Com:a%>Q1j%>        PxC                  ; !
                      +Err/Orth+N+Ess:a%>n            K                    ;
                               +N+Ess:a%>Q1n          K                    ;
                               +N+Abe:a%>Q1dak        K                    ;
                               +N+Abe:a%>Q1da         K                    ;
                            +N+Pl+Abe:a%>Q1j#dagi     K                    ;
                            +N+Pl+Abe:a%>Q1j#dagá     K                    ;
                   +Err/Orth+N+Pl+Abe:a%>Q1j#tagá     K                    ;
           +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:a»Q1X7tja       K                    ;
           +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:a»Q1X7tjij      K                    ;
           +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:a»Q1X7tjijt     K                    ;
           +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:a»Q1X7tjijda    K                    ;
           +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:a»Q1X7tjijn     K                    ;
           +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:a»Q1X7tjijs     K                    ;
           +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:a»Q1X7tjij      K                    ;
              +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:a»Q1X7tjin      K                    ;
!          +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:a»Q1X7tjijd%>   PxCs                 ; !Possessive suffixes
!          +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine:a»Q1X7tjijn%>   PxCs                 ; !
!          +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela:a»Q1X7tjijst%>  PxCs                 ; !
           +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:a»Q1X7tja#dagi  K                    ;
           +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:a»Q1X7tja#dagá  K                    ;
  +Err/Orth+N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Abe:a»Q1X7tja#tagá  K                    ;
           +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:a»Q1X7tjij#dagi K                    ;
           +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:a»Q1X7tjij#dagá K                    ;
  +Err/Orth+N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Abe:a»Q1X7tjij#tagá K                    ;
!                                  +N:a%>Q1»          DenominalNounsMUORRA ; !Skal jo ikke ha Sg siden det er pl lexicon, heller ikke mulig med dobbel dim.
!                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N:a»Q1X7tj        OTH-ODDCASE          ; !Kun mulig med pl
!          +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen:a»Q1X7tja       K                    ; !Kun mulig med pl
!          +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:a»Q1X7tjij%>    PxCs                 ; !^P^
!          +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:a»Q1X7tjijdas%> PxC                  ; !^P
!          +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:a»Q1X7tjij%>    PxCs                 ; !^P^
! +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Attr:a»Q1#gahtes%> ATTR ; bearrahahtes is right form
!               +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+Adv:a»Q1#gahtá%>    K                    ;
!               +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+Adv:a»Q1#gahti%>    K                    ;
!          +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom:a»Q1#gahtes%>   K                    ;
!          +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom:a»Q1#gahttá%>   PxV                  ; !^P^
!             +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Ess:a»Q1#gahttá%>n  K                    ;
!  +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Der5+Der/vuota:a»Q1#gahtes     VUOHTA               ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
!                 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A:a»Q1#gahttá%>   ILL-EVENCASE         ;
!                 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A:a»Q1#gahttá%>   N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
!                 +N+Der4+Der/ahtes+A:a»Q1#gahttá%>   BU/MUS               ;


!!€gt-norm: gahpanisá # Even-syllable test
!!€ gahpanisá:                 gahpanisá+N+Pl+Nom
!!€ gahpanisájda:                 gahpanisá+N+Pl+Ill
!!€ gahpanisájs:                 gahpanisá+N+Pl+Ela
