src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx
berrahattja+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:berrahadtj BERRAHATTJA ;
gahpanisá+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:gahpaniss BERRAHATTJA ;
gierugattja+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:gierugadtj BERRAHATTJA ;
lagámusá+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:lagámuss BERRAHATTJA ;
oarbbenattja+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:oarbbenadtj BERRAHATTJA ;
sjuhtjunisá+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:sjuhtjuniss BERRAHATTJA ;
venagattja+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Rel:venagadtj BERRAHATTJA ;
